fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.aff
SFX S vm      vrvmve          vm        
SFX S vm      vrosqve         vm        
SFX S vm      vrosne          vm        
SFX S vm      vrosve          vm        
SFX S vm      vrorvmqve       vm        
SFX S vm      vrorvmne        vm        
SFX S vm      vrorvmve        vm        
SFX S vm      vrasqve         vm        
SFX S vm      vrasne          vm        
SFX S vm      vrasne          vm        
SFX S vm      vrarvmqve       vm        
SFX S vm      vrarvmne        vm        
SFX S vm      vrarvmve        vm        
SFX S vm      vrisqve         vm        
SFX S vm      vrisne          vm        
SFX S vm      vrisve          vm        
SFX S vm      v               vm        
SFX S vm      vqve            vm        
SFX S vm      vne             vm        
SFX S vm      vve             vm        
SFX S vm      vs              vm        
SFX S vm      e               vm        
SFX S vm      i               vm        
SFX S vm      o               vm        
SFX S vm      a               vm        
SFX S vm      am              vm        
SFX S vm      ae              vm        
SFX S vm      æ               vm        
SFX S vm      os              vm        
SFX S vm      orvm            vm        
SFX S vm      is              vm        
SFX S vm      as              vm        
SFX S vm      arvm            vm        
SFX S vm      vsqve           vm        
SFX S vm      vsne            vm        
SFX S vm      vsve            vm        
SFX S vm      eqve            vm        
SFX S vm      ene             vm        
SFX S vm      eve             vm        
SFX S vm      iqve            vm        
SFX S vm      ine             vm        
SFX S vm      ive             vm        
SFX S vm      oqve            vm        
SFX S vm      one             vm        
SFX S vm      ove             vm        
SFX S vm      aqve            vm        
SFX S vm      ane             vm        
SFX S vm      ave             vm        
SFX S vm      amqve           vm        
SFX S vm      amne            vm        
SFX S vm      amve            vm        
SFX S vm      aeqve           vm        
SFX S vm      aene            vm        
SFX S vm      aeve            vm        
SFX S vm      æqve            vm        
SFX S vm      æne             vm        
SFX S vm      æve             vm        
SFX S vm      vmqve           vm        
SFX S vm      vmne            vm        
SFX S vm      vmve            vm        
SFX S vm      osqve           vm        
SFX S vm      osne            vm        
SFX S vm      osve            vm        
SFX S vm      orvmqve         vm        
SFX S vm      orvmne          vm        
SFX S vm      orvmve          vm        
SFX S vm      isqve           vm        
SFX S vm      isne            vm        
SFX S vm      isve            vm        
SFX S vm      asqve           vm        
SFX S vm      asne            vm        
SFX S vm      asve            vm        
SFX S vm      arvmqve         vm        
SFX S vm      arvmne          vm        
SFX S vm      arvmve          vm        
SFX S us      us              us        
SFX S us      urus            us        
SFX S us      ure             us        
SFX S us      uri             us        
SFX S us      uro             us        
SFX S us      ura             us        
SFX S us      uram            us        
SFX S us      urae            us        
SFX S us      uræ             us        
SFX S us      urum            us        
SFX S us      uros            us        
SFX S us      urorum          us        
SFX S us      uras            us        
SFX S us      urarum          us        
SFX S us      uris            us        
SFX S us      urusque         us        
SFX S us      urusne          us        
SFX S us      urusve          us        
SFX S us      urusue          us          
SFX S us      ureque          us        
SFX S us      urene           us        
SFX S us      ureve           us        
SFX S us      ureue           us          
SFX S us      urique          us        
SFX S us      urine           us        
SFX S us      urive           us        
SFX S us      uriue           us          
SFX S us      uroque          us        
SFX S us      urone           us        
SFX S us      urove           us        
SFX S us      uroue           us          
SFX S us      uraque          us        
SFX S us      urane           us        
SFX S us      urave           us        
SFX S us      uraue           us          
SFX S us      uramque         us        
SFX S us      uramne          us        
SFX S us      uramve          us        
SFX S us      uramue          us          
SFX S us      uraeque         us        
SFX S us      uraene          us        
SFX S us      uraeve          us        
SFX S us      uraeue          us          
SFX S us      urumque         us        
SFX S us      urumne          us        
SFX S us      urumve          us        
SFX S us      urumue          us          
SFX S us      urosque         us        
SFX S us      urosne          us        
SFX S us      urosve          us        
SFX S us      urosue          us          
SFX S us      urorumque       us        
SFX S us      urorumne        us        
SFX S us      urorumve        us        
SFX S us      urorumue        us          
SFX S us      urasque         us        
SFX S us      urasne          us        
SFX S us      urasve          us        
SFX S us      urasue          us          
SFX S us      urarumque       us        
SFX S us      urarumne        us        
SFX S us      urarumve        us        
SFX S us      urarumue        us          
SFX S us      urisque         us        
SFX S us      urisne          us        
SFX S us      urisve          us        
SFX S us      urisue          us          
SFX S us      u               us        
SFX S us      uque            us        
SFX S us      une             us        
SFX S us      uve             us        
SFX S us      uue             us          
SFX S us      um              us        
SFX S us      e               us        
SFX S us      i               us        
SFX S us      o               us        
SFX S us      a               us        
SFX S us      am              us        
SFX S us      ae              us        
SFX S us      os              us        
SFX S us      orum            us        
SFX S us      is              us        
SFX S us      as              us        
SFX S us      arum            us        
SFX S 0       que             us        
SFX S 0       ne              us        
SFX S 0       ve              us        
SFX S 0       ue              us          
SFX S us      umque           us        
SFX S us      umne            us        
SFX S us      umve            us        
SFX S us      umue            us          
SFX S us      eque            us        
SFX S us      ene             us        
SFX S us      eve             us        
SFX S us      eue             us          
SFX S us      ique            us        
SFX S us      ine             us        
SFX S us      ive             us        
SFX S us      iue             us          
SFX S us      oque            us        
SFX S us      one             us        
SFX S us      ove             us        
SFX S us      oue             us          
SFX S us      aque            us        
SFX S us      ane             us        
SFX S us      ave             us        
SFX S us      aue             us          
SFX S us      amque           us        
SFX S us      amne            us        
SFX S us      amve            us        
SFX S us      amue            us          
SFX S us      aeque           us        
SFX S us      aene            us        
SFX S us      aeve            us        
SFX S us      aeue            us          
SFX S us      æque            us        
SFX S us      æne             us        
SFX S us      æve             us        
